Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1187.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Corporal Harold L. Gray Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) Corporal Harold L. Gray was born February 5, 1915, in Coal Run, a small 10-house coal mining settlement in Summit Township, Somerset County, located between Meyersdale and Salisbury.(2) Corporal Gray was the son of Dorthea Ritenour Gray and John Gray, living among coal mining families and his extended relatives.(3) In the early 1920s, Corporal Gray's family relocated to Garrett, where he spent his formative years.(4) Following the death of his father in 1936, Corporal 12345678910111213141516171819 Gray left school at 15 years of age to work in the coal mines to support his family.(5) Later in the late 1930s, Corporal Gray moved to Akron, Ohio, to live with relatives, train as a boxer under his uncle, a professional fighter, and work as a baker decorating cakes, earning recognition for his skill and creativity.(6) In 1942, aware that his draft number was approaching, Corporal Gray walked from Garrett to Cumberland, Maryland, to enlist in the United States Navy. When Corporal Gray returned home, he found his draft notice had already been issued.(7) During World War II, Corporal Gray was enlisted in the United States Army and assigned to Company C, 25th Armored Engineers, Sixth Armored Division, Third United States Army, commanded by General George S. Patton.(8) Due to Corporal Gray's background as a coal miner, he possessed the necessary expertise in handling explosives, making him well-suited for engineering assignments.(9) During the war, Corporal Gray participated in the invasion of Normandy, where he suffered his first injury while engaged in combat in the hedgerows of northern France.(10) Later, at the Battle of the Bulge, Corporal Gray's unit took part in the breakthrough during the siege of Bastogne, Belgium, a critical Allied counteroffensive that helped turn the tide against German forces in Western Europe. (11) Near the end of the war, while on a mission to clear a minefield near Hillesheim, Germany, Corporal Gray was severely wounded by enemy machine gun fire that claimed the lives of his entire squad.20260SB1187PN1435 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (12) Despite sustaining a leg wound, Corporal Gray feigned death to avoid enemy detection. Under the cover of darkness, he eventually returned to alert his division that the minefield remained unclear, saving numerous lives.(13) For Corporal Gray's extraordinary bravery, he was awarded the Silver Star, four Bronze Stars, a Purple Heart with oak leaf cluster and a Presidential Unit Citation.(14) In recognition of Corporal Gray's service and awards, he was mustered out prior to the war's end and transferred to Fort Indiantown Gap, where he served as a noncommissioned officer responsible for mustering out other troops.(15) On August 18, 1945, Corporal Gray married Lily Diehl Gray while still in military service.(16) In 1950, after returning to Garrett, Corporal Gray and his wife purchased a 75-acre farm where they lived and raised three sons. Over the next 39 years, Corporal Gray returned to work in the coal mines, demonstrating a lifelong commitment to his family's and the region's mining heritage.(17) Following the closure of the coal mines, Corporal Gray worked for the Borough of Garrett, maintaining the streets and water system by applying his engineering expertise, including assisting the Army Corps of Engineers with ice-jam removal on the Casselman River.(18) During his life, Corporal Gray was known for his intellect, athleticism, work ethic and commitment to community, as well as his talents in mathematics, hunting, gardening and boxing.(19) On November 2, 1997, Corporal Gray passed away at Lee Hospital in Johnstown.20260SB1187PN1435 - 3 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 (20) Corporal Harold L. Gray's life was defined by resilience, perseverance and integrity. From his courage and sacrifice during World War II to his enduring contributions at home, his legacy reflects lifelong service to his community, this Commonwealth and the nation, and is deserving of public recognition and lasting commemoration.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 45346, carrying Pennsylvania Route 653 over Buffalo Creek in Garrett Borough, Somerset County, is designated the Corporal Harold L. Gray Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1187PN1435 - 4 - 123456789101112131415